Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 2. Terms of Office after First Election

§ 15-11-201.
Councilmen in newly incorporated city or town.

At the first meeting of the council after the first election in a newly incorporated city or town, other than a first class city or municipality adopting the city manager or commission form of government, two (2) of the councilmen first elected shall be selected by lots to serve four (4) year terms and two (2) to serve two (2) year terms. At each subsequent general election, two (2) councilmen shall be elected to serve a four (4) year term.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-343; W.S. 1977, §

22-23-601

; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

§ 15-11-202.
Councilmen in first class city.

At the first election in a city which has divided into wards two (2) or three (3) councilmen shall be elected from each ward for the following terms:

If two (2) councilmen are elected from each ward, one (1) councilman shall serve a two (2) year term and one (1) councilman shall serve a four (4) year term;

If three (3) councilmen are elected from each ward, one (1) councilman shall serve a two (2) year term and two (2) councilmen shall serve a four (4) year term;

The terms of office shall be determined by lots cast by the council at its first meeting.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-344; W.S. 1977, §

22-23-602

; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 15-11-203.
Municipality with commission government.

At the first election in a municipality adopting the commission form of government, the mayor shall be elected to serve a four (4) year term and all other officers shall be elected to serve a two (2) year term.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-345; W.S. 1977, §

22-23-603

; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4; 2005, ch. 25, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

inserted “the mayor shall be elected to serve a four (4) year term and all other.”

Laws 2005, ch. 25, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

Prospective application. —

Laws 2005, ch. 25, § 2, provides that nothing in the act shall be deemed to extend the current term of office of any elected official serving on the effective date of the act.

§ 15-11-204.
Municipality with city manager government.

At the first election in a municipality adopting the city manager form of government, a majority of the councilmen elected shall serve two (2) year terms and the balance of the councilmen elected shall serve four (4) year terms. The terms of office shall be determined by lots cast by the council at its first meeting.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-346; W.S. 1977, § 22-23-604; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

§ 15-11-205.
Election of councilmen in city manager government having alternate method of representation.

At the first election in a city manager form municipality, after adopting an alternate method of representation, councilmen shall be elected equal in number to the number of council terms expiring. Offices expiring shall be filled by candidates from wards having the lowest number designation and not having a holdover member on the council. At the second election, candidates will be elected from wards not having holdover members. Councilmen shall be elected for the regular four (4) year term.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-347; W.S. 1977, § 22-23-605; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4.